tests/aa.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../khk.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../khk.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "оо":
    бол<v><iv><ifi> : боллоо
    бол<v><iv><imp> : болоорой
    бол<v><iv><sug> : болооч
    бол<v><iv><gna_prf> : болоод
    тойм<n><abl> : тоймоос
    тойм<n><abl><refl> : тоймоосоо
    тойм<n><gen><refl> : тоймынхоо

 "аа":
    гар<n><abl> : гараас
    гар<n><abl><refl> : гараасаа
    гар<n><gen><refl> : гарынхаа

 "ээ":
    гэр<n><abl> : гэрээс
    гэр<n><abl><refl> : гэрээсээ
    гэр<n><gen><refl> : гэрийнхээ
    нүд<n><abl> : нүднээс
    нүд<n><abl><refl> : нүднээсээ
    нүд<n><gen><refl> : нүднийнхээ
    ир<v><iv><ifi> : ирлээ
    ир<v><iv><imp> : ирээрэй
    ир<v><iv><sug> : ирээч
    ир<v><iv><gna_prf> : ирээд

 "өө":
    өмд<n><abl> : өмдөөс
    өмд<n><abl><refl> : өмдөөсөө
    өмд<n><gen><refl> : өмдийнхөө

 "иа":
    ярь<v><iv><ifi> : ярьлаа
    ярь<v><iv><imp> : яриарай
    ярь<v><iv><sug> : яриач
    ярь<v><iv><gna_prf> : яриад

 "ио":
    морь<n><abl> : мориос
    морь<n><abl><refl> : мориосоо
    морь<n><gen><refl> : морийнхоо
